Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.010

Voting, registration irregularities.

(1) A county auditor who suspects a person of fraudulent voter registration, vote tampering, or irregularities in voting shall transmit his or her suspicions and observations without delay to the canvassing board.

(2) The county auditor shall make a good faith effort to contact the person in question without delay. If the county auditor is unable to contact the person, or if, after contacting the person, the auditor still suspects fraudulent voter registration, vote tampering, or irregularities in voting, the auditor shall refer the issue to the county prosecuting attorney to determine if further action is warranted.

(3) When a complaint providing information concerning fraudulent voter registration, vote tampering, or irregularities in voting is presented to the office of the prosecuting attorney, that office shall file charges in all cases where warranted.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2101; 2001 c 41 s 12. Formerly RCW 29.85.245.]